dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xM ïèser iserave/J4FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràveu/I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave/FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave-l/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserise-l/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave-ƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserise-ƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràvel/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserísel/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràveƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseríseƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràemi/I1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J6 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràemi/I6 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràetu/j3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J4I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseríse-l/J5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseríse-ƚo/j5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràl/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iseràƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser isemo/J2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémoi/I2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isimo/J2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímoi/I2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isè/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isé/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isié/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isipiemo ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isipimo ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isipié ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isipiè ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isipí ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iseré/J4I4V0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iserí/J4I4V0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isemo/V0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémoge/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isimo/V0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímoge/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémogel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímogel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémogeƚo/R3A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímogeƚo/R3A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser ison/V0V3V4 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser isónge/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser isóngel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser isen/V0V3V4 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser isénge/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser iséngel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser iesudo/M0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX xM ïèser iesuda/F0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX xM ïèser istado/M0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX xM ïèser istada/F0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX xM èser esente/FS èser	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xM ïèser isiante ïèser	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xM èser esènte/FS èser	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xM ser rel/I5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ijèrel/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser iɉèrel/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ixèrel/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser eséndogel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser esàndogel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM ïèser isiàndogel/P2A1 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser eséndegel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser esàndegel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM ïèser isiàndegel/P2A1 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser eséntogel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM èser esàntogel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM ïèser isiàntogel/P2A1 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM èser esèntogel/P2A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM ïèser isè/V0V3V4V5V6 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isège/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isé/V0V3V4V5V6 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isége/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isègel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iségel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí/V0V3V4V5V6 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isígel/R2A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ser reƚo/i5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ijèreƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser iɉèreƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ixèreƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser eséndogeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser esàndogeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM ïèser isiàndogeƚo/P3 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser eséndegeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser esàndegeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM ïèser isiàndegeƚo/P3 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser eséntogeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM èser esàntogeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM ïèser isiàntogeƚo/P3 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM èser esèntogeƚo/P3 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM ïèser isègeƚo/R3A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iségeƚo/R3A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isígeƚo/R3A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí/J3I3V5V6 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xM ïèser isís/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xM ïèser isipia ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + a
SFX xM ïèser isipi ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xM ïèser ison/J1 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isúʼ ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e, coxòto
SFX xM ïèser ision/J1 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isónmi/I1 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isójo ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isóɉo ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e, venethian
SFX xM ïèser isóɉu ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e, coxòto
SFX xM ïèser isónɉo ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e, venethian
SFX xM ïèser isiónmi/I1 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isé/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM ïèser isés/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM èser é/J3I3 èser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM èser és/J3I3 èser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xM ïèser ixé/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM ser 0/J3I3 èser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM er 0/J3I3 èser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM er 0 èser	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xM ïèser isé ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ïèser isé-l/J5 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ïèser isé-ƚo/j5 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM èser é èser	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM èser é-l/J5 èser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM èser é-ƚo/j5 èser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ser 0 èser	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ser -l/J5 èser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ser -ƚo/j5 èser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ïèser ixé ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ïèser ixé-l/J5 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ïèser ixé-ƚo/j5 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xM ïèser isipie ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isíe ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isie ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isee ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xM ïèser isipia ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM ïèser isipie ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xM ïèser isíe ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
